Texas statutes.
TRANSPORTATION CODE

TITLE 6. ROADWAYS

SUBTITLE B. STATE HIGHWAY SYSTEM

CHAPTER 226. EMERGENCY HIGHWAY CALL BOX SYSTEM

Sec. 226.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "emergency response services" means:

(1) fire-fighting, law enforcement, or emergency medical services that are provided by a public agency; or

(2) motorist assistance services.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1171, Sec. 1.42, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 226.002. APPLICABILITY; LIMITATION ON EXPENDITURES. This chapter does not:

(1) apply to a segment of a highway that the commission has designated as a farm-to-market or ranch-to-market road; or

(2) authorize the department to make an expenditure of money for the implementation, operation, or maintenance of the emergency telephone call box system out of the state highway fund.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1171, Sec. 1.42, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 226.003. INSTALLATION, OPERATION, AND MAINTENANCE OF CALL BOX SYSTEM. (a) The department may provide for the installment, operation, and maintenance of a system of emergency telephone call boxes along those highways in this state that are part of the designated state highway system.

(b) The system may:

(1) be designed to enable users of those highways to request emergency and nonemergency response services;

(2) include:

(A) wired or wireless telecommunications services; and

(B) one or more motorist assistance answering centers; and

(3) be capable of performing compatible Intelligent Transportation System (ITS) functions.

(c) To minimize call processing loads in public safety answering points established under Chapter 771 or 772, Health and Safety Code, the department may contract with a private entity to perform the functions of a motorist assistance answering center under Subsection (b)(2)(B).

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1171, Sec. 1.42, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 226.004. FUNDING. The department may implement a call box system under this chapter if a public or private entity provides all direct and indirect costs necessary for the installment, operation, and maintenance of the system.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1171, Sec. 1.42, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 226.005. LOCATION OF AND DISTANCE BETWEEN CALL BOXES. The location of the emergency call boxes shall be determined by the department in accordance with the design specifications of the system.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1171, Sec. 1.42, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 226.006. CONTRACTS FOR IMPLEMENTATION AND INSTALLATION. (a) The department may award a contract for the installation, maintenance, or operation of a call box system in the manner provided by Chapter 223.

(b) The department may solicit proposals for and enter into one or more lease-purchase agreements under this chapter.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1171, Sec. 1.42, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 226.007. INTERGOVERNMENTAL COOPERATION. The Advisory Commission on State Emergency Communications, agencies of this state, and each county and municipality in this state shall cooperate in the design, establishment, operation, and maintenance of the emergency telephone call box system.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1171, Sec. 1.42, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.